Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 37

Biobased Products for Farmers and Rural Development

43-37-101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Biobased Products for Farmers and Rural Development Act of 2000.”

Acts 2000, ch. 838, § 2.

Cross-References. Biofuels and the implementation of incentives to encourage the production of biofuels, § 54-1-136.

Collateral References. Agriculture, 23

Crops, 111

43-37-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Ag Fiber Technology” means a unique public/private sector coalition organized by Agro-Tech Communications of Memphis, Tennessee and based at Agricenter International in Memphis, Tennessee. Ag Fiber Technology is comprised of environmental organizations, universities, research institutions, and private corporations that share the goal of advancing biobased products through the commercialization of agricultural fibers;

“Agricultural biomass” means crop residues from commodity crops such as wheat, corn, cotton and new crops such as switchgrass. “Agricultural biomass” has unique and strategic positioning in expanding markets for power, fuel and chemicals;

“Agricultural fiber” means any fiber material derived from an agricultural crop including, but not limited to, corn stover, cotton, kenaf, rice straw, switchgrass, and wheat straw. Agricultural fibers are the building blocks of biobased products and contain cellulose, lignocellulose and other properties desired by industry;

“Bast fiber crop” means crops such as kenaf that are comprised of an outer fiber “bast” and an inner fiber “core” or “hurd”. Bast fiber crops are utilized in new markets including building materials, pulp and paper, and absorbency products;

“Biobased product” means a commercial or industrial product (other than food or feed) that utilizes biological products or renewable domestic agricultural (plant, animal, and marine) or forestry materials. “Biobased product” includes building products, chemicals, fuels, lubricants, plastics, and paper derived from agricultural materials;

“Bioenergy initiative” means a national partnership coordinated by the United States department of energy to develop an integrated industry to produce power, fuel and chemicals from sources including agricultural biomass; and

“Industrial utilization” means the products and processes that utilize agricultural materials in non-food, non-feed commercial products. Industrial utilization projects in the United States have included a thirty-five million dollar ($35,000,000) kenaf auto component facility in Indiana; building materials from wheat straw in Idaho and North Dakota; and the expanded use of ethanol in the mid-west.

Acts 2000, ch. 838, § 5.

43-37-103. Unauthorized plants and substances.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the development of or research relative to any strain or variety of cannabis other than hemp, as defined in § 43-27-101.

Acts 2000, ch. 838, § 3; 2014, ch. 916, § 6; 2019, ch. 87, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning growing of industrial hemp, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 916.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “cannabis other than industrial hemp, as defined by § 43-26-102” for “Cannabis sativa L. or any other plant or substance containing a measurable quantity of any form of tetrahydrocannabinol (THC)”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “hemp, as defined in § 43-27-101” for “industrial hemp, as defined by § 43-26-102.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 916, § 9. July 1, 2014; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations, the act shall take effect May 13, 2014.

Acts 2019, ch. 87, § 13. April 4, 2019.

43-37-104. Findings of general assembly.

The general assembly finds that the development of biobased products, agricultural biomass, bast fiber crops and industrial utilization is in the best interest of Tennessee's economy and agriculture. The general assembly recognizes the importance of agricultural fibers as the basic building blocks for biobased products.

The general assembly finds that the development of biobased products, agricultural biomass, bast fiber crops and industrial utilization would reduce dependence on foreign oil imports; enhance energy security; reduce environmental emissions of harmful pollutants; decrease greenhouse gas emissions; increase profitability for agricultural biomass commercial activities; revitalize rural areas with new markets and revenue streams; and would provide greater consumer choices for power, fuel and commercial products.

The general assembly finds that cooperation with the United States department of energy and United States department of agriculture's bioenergy initiative, Oak Ridge national laboratory, Tennessee State University, the University of Tennessee and other entities in Tennessee that are developing biobased products, agricultural biomass, bast fiber crops and industrial utilization is in the best interest of Tennessee's economy, environment and agriculture.

The general assembly finds that the Ag Fiber Technology program at Agricenter International has a strategic role in the development of biobased products, agricultural biomass, bast fiber crops and industrial utilization through its focus on commercializing agricultural fibers as the basic building blocks for biobased products.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote the economy, agriculture, public safety, health and welfare of the citizens of Tennessee, while promoting new opportunities for farmers and rural economies.

Acts 2000, ch. 838, § 4.

43-37-105. Authority of commissioner.

The commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2000, ch. 838, § 6.